packages/hunspell-reader/dictionaries/eu/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 188 0 hegioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hegion .
SFX 188 0 hegion/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hegio .
SFX 188 0 hegio/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hegitzakeen .
SFX 188 0 hegitzakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hegitzakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hegitzake .
SFX 188 0 hegitzake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hegitzan .
SFX 188 0 hegitzan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hegitza .
SFX 188 0 hegitza/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hegit .
SFX 188 0 hegizkidakeen .
SFX 188 0 hegizkidakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkidakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkidake .
SFX 188 0 hegizkidake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkidan .
SFX 188 0 hegizkidan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkida/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkid/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkiekeen .
SFX 188 0 hegizkiekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkiekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkieke .
SFX 188 0 hegizkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkien .
SFX 188 0 hegizkien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkie .
SFX 188 0 hegizkie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkigukeen .
SFX 188 0 hegizkigukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkigukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkiguke .
SFX 188 0 hegizkiguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkigun .
SFX 188 0 hegizkigun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkigu .
SFX 188 0 hegizkigu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkiokeen .
SFX 188 0 hegizkiokeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkiokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkioke .
SFX 188 0 hegizkioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkion .
SFX 188 0 hegizkion/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkio .
SFX 188 0 hegizkio/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hegizkit .
SFX 188 0 hegi .
SFX 188 0 hegi/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkeen .
SFX 188 0 hekarkeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarke .
SFX 188 0 hekarke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkidakeen .
SFX 188 0 hekarkidakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkidakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkidake .
SFX 188 0 hekarkidake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkidana/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkidan .
SFX 188 0 hekarkidan/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkid/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkiekeen .
SFX 188 0 hekarkiekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkiekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkieke .
SFX 188 0 hekarkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkiena/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkien .
SFX 188 0 hekarkien/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkie .
SFX 188 0 hekarkie/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkigukeen .
SFX 188 0 hekarkigukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkigukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkiguke .
SFX 188 0 hekarkiguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkiguna/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkigun .
SFX 188 0 hekarkigun/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkigu .
SFX 188 0 hekarkigu/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkiokeen .
SFX 188 0 hekarkiokeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkiokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkioke .
SFX 188 0 hekarkioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkiona/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkion .
SFX 188 0 hekarkion/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkio .
SFX 188 0 hekarkio/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 hekarkit .
SFX 188 0 hekarren .
SFX 188 0 hekarren/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekarre/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekartzakeen .
SFX 188 0 hekartzakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekartzakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekartzake .
SFX 188 0 hekartzake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekartzan .
SFX 188 0 hekartzan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekartza .
SFX 188 0 hekartza/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkidakeen .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkidakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkidakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkidake .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkidake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkidana/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkidan .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkidan/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkid/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkiekeen .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkiekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkiekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkieke .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkiena/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkien .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkien/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkie .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkie/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkigukeen .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkigukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkigukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkiguke .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkiguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkiguna/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkigun .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkigun/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkigu .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkigu/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkiokeen .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkiokeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkiokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkioke .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkiona/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkion .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkion/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkio .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkio/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 hekarzkit .
SFX 188 0 hekar .
SFX 188 0 hekarr/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 hekien .
SFX 188 0 hekien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekikeen .
SFX 188 0 hekikeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekikee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekike .
SFX 188 0 hekike/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekizke .
SFX 188 0 hekizke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekizkien .
SFX 188 0 hekizkien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekizkie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekizkikeen .
SFX 188 0 hekizkikeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekizkikee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekizki .
SFX 188 0 hekizki/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 heki .
SFX 188 0 heki/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 hekusan .
SFX 188 0 hekusan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekusazkeen .
SFX 188 0 hekusazkeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekusazkee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekusazke .
SFX 188 0 hekusazke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekusa .
SFX 188 0 hekusa/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekuskeen .
SFX 188 0 hekuskeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekuskee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekuske .
SFX 188 0 hekuske/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hekuskien .
SFX 188 0 hekuskien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hekuskie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hekuski .
SFX 188 0 hekuski/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 henbilen .
SFX 188 0 henbilen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henbile/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkeen .
SFX 188 0 henbilkeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henbilke .
SFX 188 0 henbilke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkidakeen .
SFX 188 0 henbilkidakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkidakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkidake .
SFX 188 0 henbilkidake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkidan .
SFX 188 0 henbilkidan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkida/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkid/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkiekeen .
SFX 188 0 henbilkiekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkiekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkieke .
SFX 188 0 henbilkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkien .
SFX 188 0 henbilkien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkie .
SFX 188 0 henbilkie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkigukeen .
SFX 188 0 henbilkigukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkigukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkiguke .
SFX 188 0 henbilkiguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkigun .
SFX 188 0 henbilkigun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkigu .
SFX 188 0 henbilkigu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkiokeen .
SFX 188 0 henbilkiokeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkiokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkioke .
SFX 188 0 henbilkioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkion .
SFX 188 0 henbilkion/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkio .
SFX 188 0 henbilkio/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henbilkit .
SFX 188 0 henbil .
SFX 188 0 henbil/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 hendi .
SFX 188 0 hengoen .
SFX 188 0 hengoen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hengoe/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hengokeen .
SFX 188 0 hengokeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hengokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hengoke .
SFX 188 0 hengoke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hengokidakeen .
SFX 188 0 hengokidakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hengokidakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hengokidake .
SFX 188 0 hengokidake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hengokidan .
SFX 188 0 hengokidan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hengokida/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hengokid/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 hengokiekeen .
SFX 188 0 hengokiekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hengokiekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hengokieke .
SFX 188 0 hengokieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hengokien .
SFX 188 0 hengokien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hengokie .
SFX 188 0 hengokie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hengokigukeen .
SFX 188 0 hengokigukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hengokigukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hengokiguke .
SFX 188 0 hengokiguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hengokigun .
SFX 188 0 hengokigun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hengokigu .
SFX 188 0 hengokigu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hengokiokeen .
SFX 188 0 hengokiokeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hengokiokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hengokioke .
SFX 188 0 hengokioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 hengokion .
SFX 188 0 hengokion/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 hengokio .
SFX 188 0 hengokio/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 hengokit .
SFX 188 0 hengo .
SFX 188 0 hengo/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 henkidakeen .
SFX 188 0 henkidakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henkidakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henkidake .
SFX 188 0 henkidake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 henkiekeen .
SFX 188 0 henkiekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henkiekeen .
SFX 188 0 henkiekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henkiekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henkiekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 henkieke .
SFX 188 0 henkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 henkieke .
SFX 188 0 henkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 henkien .
SFX 188 0 henkien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 henkie .
SFX 188 0 henkie/1,399 .
